Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 7. Redevelopment Projects.

§ 36-48.
Creation of Redevelopment Areas.

A redevelopment area as defined in §

36-3

may be created by an authority as provided in this chapter and a redevelopment plan may be adopted to address conditions in such redevelopment area. The redevelopment plan shall (i) outline specific boundaries for the redevelopment area and designate for acquisition such properties as are necessary or appropriate for the clearance, replanning, rehabilitation, and reconstruction of the redevelopment area, (ii) be adopted in accordance with §

36-49

, and (iii) satisfy the requirements as set forth in §

36-51

.

History.

1946, p. 278; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8a); 1975, c. 455; 1988, cc. 572, 591; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 42.

§ 36-48.1.
Creation of Conservation Areas.

A conservation area as defined in §

36-3

may be created by an authority as provided in this chapter and a conservation plan may be adopted to provide for the conservation, rehabilitation, and revitalization of such conservation area. The conservation plan shall (i) outline specific boundaries for the conservation area, (ii) be adopted in accordance with §

36-49.1

, and (iii) satisfy the requirements as set forth in §

36-51.1

.

History.

1964, c. 378; 1978, c. 360; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section.

§ 36-49.
Adoption of Redevelopment Plans.

An authority may adopt a redevelopment plan for a designated redevelopment area to address blighted areas and in particular is specifically empowered to carry out any work or undertaking in the redevelopment area, including any or all of the following:

Acquire blighted areas, which are hereby defined in §

36-3

;

Acquire other real property for the purpose of removing, preventing, or reducing blight;

Acquire real property where the condition of the title, the diverse ownership of the real property to be assembled, the street or lot layouts, or other conditions prevent a proper development of the property and where the acquisition of the area by the authority is necessary to carry out a redevelopment plan;

Permit the preservation, repair, or restoration of buildings of historic interest; and to clear any areas acquired and install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, and site improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan;

Provide for the conservation of portions of the project area and the rehabilitation to project standards as stated in the redevelopment plan of buildings within the project area, where such rehabilitation is deemed by the authority to be feasible and consistent with project objectives;

Make land so acquired available to nongovernmental persons or entities or public agencies (including sale, leasing, or retention by the authority itself) in accordance with the redevelopment plan;

Assist the reconstruction of project areas by making loans or grants of funds received from any public or private source, for the purpose of facilitating the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation or sale of housing or other improvements constructed or to be constructed on land situated within the boundaries of a redevelopment project;

Acquire, construct or rehabilitate residential housing developments for occupancy by persons of low, moderate and middle income to be owned, operated, managed, leased, conveyed, mortgaged, encumbered or assigned by an authority. Income limits for such persons shall be determined for each redevelopment project by an authority by resolution adopted by a majority of its appointed commissioners, shall be adjusted for household size and may be revised as an authority deems appropriate. In connection with a residential housing development, an authority shall have all rights, powers and privileges granted by subdivision 4 of §

36-19

;

Accomplish any combination of the foregoing to carry out a redevelopment plan; and

Exercise such other powers as are authorized by law.

No redevelopment plan shall be effective until notice has been sent to the property owner or owners of record in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

and the redevelopment plan has been approved by the local governing body.

History.

1946, p. 278; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8b); 1962, c. 336; 1972, cc. 466, 782; 1980, c. 133; 1988, cc. 572, 591; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Undertakings constituting redevelopment projects”; inserted the subsection A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B; substituted the present subsection A for “Any authority nor or hereafter established, in addition to other powers granted by this or any law, is specifically empowered to carry out any work or undertaking (hereafter called a ‘redevelopment project’)”; rewrote subdivision A 1, which formerly defined blighted and deteriorated areas; deleted “blighting factors or the cause of the blight” following “reducing blight” in subdivision A 2;
substituted “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private enterprise” in subdivision A 6; deleted language specifying the applications of the subdivision following “subdivision 4 of §

36-19

” in subdivision A 8; added subdivision A 10; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 36-49.1.
Adoption of Conservation Plans.

An authority may adopt a conservation plan for a designated conservation area to address blight and blighting conditions, to conserve such area, prevent further deterioration and prevent such area from becoming blighted, and in particular is specifically empowered to carry out any work or undertaking in the conservation area, including any or all of the following:

Acquire property within such areas which is blighted, designated for public use in the conservation plan, or the use or condition of which is inconsistent with the purposes of the conservation plan or the provisions of the zoning ordinance or code of the locality;

Rehabilitate or clear property so acquired;

Provide for the installation, construction or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, parking facilities, playgrounds, public buildings and other site improvements essential to the conservation or rehabilitation planned;

Make land or improvements so acquired available to nongovernmental persons or entities or public agencies (by sale, lease or retention of ownership by the authority itself);

Assist the reconstruction of project areas by making loans or grants of funds received from any public or private source, for the purpose of facilitating the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation or sale of housing or other improvements constructed or to be constructed on land situated within the boundaries of a conservation project;

Encourage and assist property owners or occupants within the conservation area to improve their respective holdings, by suggesting improved standards for design, construction, maintenance and use of such properties and offering encouragement or assistance in other ways including the power to lend money and make grants to owners or occupants, directed toward prevention and elimination of blight;

Acquire, construct or rehabilitate residential housing developments for occupancy by persons of low, moderate and middle income to be owned, operated, managed, leased, conveyed, mortgaged, encumbered or assigned by an authority. Income limits for such persons shall be determined for each conservation project by an authority by resolution adopted by a majority of its appointed commissioners, shall be adjusted for household size and may be revised as an authority deems appropriate. In connection with a residential housing development, an authority shall have all rights, power and privileges granted by subdivision 4 of §

36-19

; and

Exercise such other powers as are authorized by law.

No conservation plan shall be effective until notice has been sent to the property owner or owners of record in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

and the conservation plan has been approved by the local governing body.

History.

1964, c. 378; 1966, cc. 81, 418; 1968, c. 312; 1970, cc. 222, 491, 555, 596; 1972, c. 174; 1973, c. 29; 1974, c. 137; 1975, c. 532; 1976, c. 510; 1980, c. 133; 1988, cc. 572, 591; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Preparation and adoption of ‘conservation plan’ by cities, counties and towns; authority to carry out ‘conservation project’; public hearing prior to approval of plan”; substituted subsection A for the former introductory language, relating to the powers of an authority in regards to deteriorating areas and conservations plans; deleted “To” preceding the first word in subdivisions A 1 through A 7; substituted “locality” for “city, county or town” in subdivision A 1; substituted “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private enterprise” in subdivision A 4; deleted language relating to the effective dates of the subdivision following “subdivision 4 of §

36-19

” in subdivision A 7; and substituted “Exercise such other powers as are authorized by law” for “The governing body shall conduct a public hearing prior to approval of a conservation
plan” in subdivision A 8.

§ 36-49.1:1.
Spot blight abatement authorized; procedure.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an authority, or any locality, shall have the power to acquire or repair any blighted property, as defined in §

36-3

, whether inside or outside of a conservation or redevelopment area, by purchase or through the exercise of the power of eminent domain provided in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1, and, further, shall have the power to hold, clear, repair, manage or dispose of such property for purposes consistent with this chapter. In addition, the authority and locality shall have the power to recover the costs of any repair or disposal of such property from the owner or owners of record, determined in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

. This power shall be exercised only in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.

The chief executive or designee of the locality or authority shall make a preliminary determination that a property is blighted in accordance with this chapter. It shall send notice to the owner or owners of record determined in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

, specifying the reasons why the property is blighted. The owner or owners of record shall have 30 days from the date the notice is sent in which to respond in writing with a spot blight abatement plan to address the blight within a reasonable time.

If the owner or owners of record fail to respond within the 30-day period with a written spot blight abatement plan that is acceptable to the chief executive of the agency, authority or locality, the agency, authority or locality may request the locality to declare the property as blighted, which declaration shall be by ordinance adopted by the governing body.

No spot blight abatement plan shall be effective until notice has been sent to the property owner or owners of record and an ordinance has been adopted by the local governing body. Written notice to the property owner shall be sent by regular mail to the last address listed for the owner on the locality’s assessment records for the property, together with a copy of such spot blight abatement plan prepared by the agency, authority, or locality. If the repair or other disposition of the property is approved, the authority, agency, or locality may carry out the approved plan to repair or acquire and dispose of the property in accordance with the approved plan, the provisions of this section, and the applicable law.

If the ordinance is adopted by the governing body of the locality, the locality shall have a lien on all property so repaired or acquired under an approved spot blight abatement plan to recover the cost of (i) improvements made by such locality to bring the blighted property into compliance with applicable building codes and (ii) disposal, if any. The lien on such property shall bear interest at the legal rate of interest established in §

6.2-301

, beginning on the date the repairs are completed through the date on which the lien is paid. The lien authorized by this subsection may be recorded as a lien among the land records of the circuit court, which lien shall be treated in all respects as a tax lien and enforceable in the same manner as provided in Articles 3 (§

58.1-3940

et seq.) and 4 (§

58.1-3965

et seq.) of Chapter 39 of Title 58.1. The governing body may recover its costs of repair from the owner or owners of record of the property when the repairs were made at such time as the property is sold or disposed of by such owner or owners. If the property is acquired by the governing body through eminent domain, the cost of repair may be recovered when the governing body sells or disposes of the property. In either case, the costs of repair shall be recovered from the proceeds of any such sale.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, unless otherwise provided for in Title 36, if the blighted property is occupied for personal residential purposes, the governing body, in approving the spot blight abatement plan, shall not acquire by eminent domain such property if it would result in a displacement of the person or persons living in the premises. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to acquisitions, under an approved spot blight abatement plan, by any locality of property which has been condemned for human habitation for more than one year. In addition, such locality exercising the powers of eminent domain in accordance with Title 25.1, may provide for temporary relocation of any person living in the blighted property provided the relocation is within the financial means of such person.

In lieu of the acquisition of blighted property by the exercise of eminent domain, and in lieu of the exercise of other powers granted in subsections A through H, any locality may, by ordinance, declare any blighted property as defined in §

36-3

to constitute a nuisance, and thereupon abate the nuisance pursuant to §

15.2-900

or §

15.2-1115

. Such ordinance shall be adopted only after written notice by certified mail to the owner or owners at the last known address of such owner as shown on the current real estate tax assessment books or current real estate tax assessment records. If the owner does not abate or remove the nuisance and the locality abates or removes the nuisance at its expense, the costs of the removal or abatement of the nuisance shall be a lien on the property and such lien shall bear interest at the legal rate of interest established in §

6.2-301

, beginning on the date the removal or abatement is completed through the date on which the lien is paid.

The provisions of this section shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to any remedies for spot blight abatement that may be authorized by law.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 5, 10; 1995, cc. 702, 827; 1996, c. 847; 1997, c. 572; 1998, cc. 690, 898; 1999, cc. 39, 410, 418; 2001, c. 482; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 784; 2007, c. 763; 2009, cc. 181, 551.

Cross references.

As to authority of locality to be appointed to act as a receiver to repair derelict and blighted buildings in certain limited circumstances, see §

15.2-907.2

.

As to when delinquent taxes may be deemed paid in full, see §

58.1-3970.2

.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, Title 6.2 references were substituted for Title 6.1 references to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 702 and 827 are identical, and inserted “repair or other” throughout the section; in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “or any county, city or town which does not have an authority” following “an authority”, inserted “or repair” following “to acquire”, and inserted “repair” following “clear”; in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “vacant” preceding “property” and inserted “in accordance with this article” following “blighted”; substituted “to the chief executive of the agency, authority or locality, the agency, authority or locality” for “the agency or authority, the agency or authority” in subsection C; deleted “by the authority” following “of the property” in the second sentence of subsection D; deleted “vacant and” following “property is” in subdivision D 2; deleted “of the authority” near the beginning of subdivision D 3; in subsection F, in the third sentence, substituted “repair or other disposition” for “acquisition”, inserted “agency or locality” following “authority”, and inserted “repair or” following “approved plan to”; added present subsection G; and redesignated former subsection G as present subsection H.

The 1996 amendment

added the present second sentence in subsection A, added the fourth through eighth sentences in subsection F, and added the second and third sentences in subsection G.

The 1997 amendment

inserted “or governing body” at the end of subdivision E 4; in the fourth sentence of subsection F, inserted “or town” following “and any city” and substituted “county, city or town” for “county or city”; and in subsection G, inserted “or town” following “and any city” in the second sentence, and substituted “county, city or town” for “county or city” in the third sentence.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 690, in subsections A, F and G, deleted “and” following “form of government,” and inserted the language beginning “and any county” and ending “to such county”; and in subsection H (now subsection I), substituted “Chapter 19 (§

15.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 15.2” for “§ 15.1-238.”

The 1998 amendment by c. 898, in the second sentence of subsection A, deleted “and” preceding “any city” and inserted “any city with a population between 52,500 and 54,000, any city with a population between 110,000 and 120,000 and any city with a population between 200,000 and 210,000,” inserted present subsection G (now subsection H) and redesignated former subsections G and H as present subsections H and I (now subsections G and I), and deleted “§ 15.1-238 or any other provision of” in present subsection I.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 39, 410 and 418 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “the locality” for “any county, city or town which does not have an authority” in the first sentence, and substituted “the locality” for “any county with the urban county executive form of government, any city totally contained within such county, any county with the county executive form of government which is adjacent to such county, any city with a population between 52,500 and 54,000, any city with a population between 110,000 and 120,000 and any city with a population between 200,000 and 210,000” in the second sentence; in subsections B and C, substituted “of the locality” for “of the county, city, or town”; substituted “in the locality” for “in the county, city, or town” in subsection D; substituted “The locality shall have a lien on all property so repaired or acquired under an approved plan to recover the cost of (i) improvements made by such locality” for “Any county with the urban county executive form of government, any city or town totally contained within such county, and any county with the county executive form of government which is adjacent to such county, any city with a population between 52,500 and 54,000, any city with a population between 110,000 and 120,000 and any city with a population between 200,000 and 210,000 shall have a lien on all property so repaired or acquired under an approved plan to recover the cost of (i) improvements made by such county, city or town” in subsection F, in the fourth sentence; substituted “locality of property which has been condemned for human habitation for more than one year. In addition, such locality” for “county with the urban county executive form of government, any city or town totally contained within such county, and any county with the county executive form of government which is adjacent to such county, any city with a population between 52,500 and 54,000, any city with a population between 110,000 and 120,000, and any city with a population between 200,000 and 210,000 of property which has been condemned for human habitation for more than one year. In addition, such county, city or town” in subsection G, in the second and third sentences; and in subsection H, in the first sentence, inserted “the” following “In lieu of,” inserted “the” following “property by,” and substituted “a locality” for “any county with the urban county executive form of government, any county with the county executive form of government which is adjacent to such county, any city with a population between 110,000 and 120,000, any city with a population between 52,000 and 53,000, any city with a population between 52,500 and 54,000, any city with a population between 200,000 and 210,000, and any town with a population between 14,000 and 15,000.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 482 inserted “whether inside or” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 substituted “Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1” for “Title 25” in subsection A; substituted “30” for “thirty” in subsections B and C; substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in subsection D; and substituted “Title 25.1” for “Title 25” in subsection G.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784, in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “chapter” for “article” and “title,” “§

36-3

” for “§

36-49

” and “purchase or through the exercise of the power” for “exercise of the powers,” and in the second sentence, inserted “authority and” and “or owners of record, determined in accordance with subsection B of §

36-27

”; rewrote subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “or owners of record fail” for “fails” and inserted “written spot blight abatement” twice; added the first sentence in subsection D; redesignated former subdivision E 1 as present E 2 and E 1, respectively; added the subsection G designation and made a related change; in subsection G, in the first sentence, added “If the ordinance is adopted by the governing body of the locality” and “spot blight abatement” and inserted “or owners” twice in the third sentence; redesignated former subsection G through I as subsections H through J; in subsection H, in the first sentence, inserted “other” and “spot blight abatement” and substituted “acquire by eminent domain” for “allow for an acquisition,” and inserted “spot blight abatement” in the second sentence; and in the first sentence of subsection I, substituted “eminent domain” for “the powers of eminent domain as herein provided,” “A through H” for “A through F” and “§

36-3

” for “§

36-49

.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 763 inserted the second sentence in subsection G; and, added the last sentence in subsection I and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 181 and 551 are identical, and in subsection C, deleted clause (i) designator preceding “may request the,” deleted “local planning commission to conduct a public hearing and make findings and recommendations that shall be reported to the governing body of the” following “may request the,” and substituted “to declare the property as blighted, which declaration shall be by ordinance adopted by the governing body” for “concerning the repair or other disposition of the property in question and (ii) in the event a public hearing is scheduled, shall prepare a written spot blight abatement plan for the repair or other disposition of the property”; rewrote subsection D; deleted former subsections E and F; redesignated former subsections G through J as present subsections E through H, respectively; in present subsection E, rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “The lien authorized by this subsection shall be filed in the circuit court where the property is located and shall be subordinate to any prior liens of record.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

City is authorized to repaint house in historical district. —

Change in the color scheme of an owner’s house located in a city historical district and subject to a spot blight abatement plan under §

36-49.1:1

constituted an alteration requiring approval by the city board of architectural review within the meaning of Alexandria, Va., Zoning Ordinance § 10-105(1)(A)(1); because that approval had not been granted, the city had the power to repaint the house in a historically appropriate color scheme. Hoy v. City of Alexandria, 70 Va. Cir. 79, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 306 (Alexandria Nov. 2, 2005).

City has power to require approval of blighted property’s color scheme. —

Power of a city over property in blighted areas under §§

36-49

and

36-49.1:1

and under Alexandria, Va., City Charter § 2.04.2(b) included the authority to modify the spot blight abatement plan for an owner’s house included in a spot blight abatement program and located in a historical district to require approval by the city department of planning and zoning of the historical appropriateness of the house’s color scheme. Hoy v. City of Alexandria, 70 Va. Cir. 79, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 306 (Alexandria Nov. 2, 2005).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Housing ordinance is unauthorized

to the extent that it applies in areas other than conservation and rehabilitation districts designated by the city’s local governing body, or it applies in areas other than those designated as blighted under this section. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas D. Gear, Member, House of Delegates, 02-104, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 163 (12/18/02).

§ 36-49.2.
Power to purchase or lease land for certain other redevelopment projects.

In addition to the other powers to acquire real property by purchase or lease, an authority is specifically empowered to purchase or lease real property for immediate or future use, without the exercise of the power of eminent domain, for improvement and development for sale, lease, or sublease as industrial sites, scientific research laboratory sites, educational institution sites or sites for housing persons displaced from other lands of the authority.

History.

1964, Ex. Sess., c. 16.

§ 36-50.
Extension of general powers for actions taken pursuant to a redevelopment plan.

In undertaking actions pursuant to a redevelopment plan, an authority shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities provided in this chapter. However, nothing contained in §§

36-21

and

36-22

shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority, in the event of a default (including failure of compliance with a redevelopment plan) by a purchaser or lessee of land in a redevelopment plan, to acquire property and operate it free from the restrictions contained in §§

36-21

and

36-22

; and provided further, that any property which an authority leases to nongovernmental persons or entities for redevelopment under a redevelopment plan shall have the same tax status as if such leased property were owned by such nongovernmental persons or entities.

History.

1946, p. 279; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8c); 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 substituted “actions taken pursuant to a redevelopment plan” for “redevelopment” in the section heading; in the first sentence, substituted “actions pursuant to a redevelopment plan” for “redevelopment project” and “provided in this chapter” for language describing certain powers held by the authority, and in the second sentence, added “However” and substituted “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private corporations, individuals, or partnerships” twice.

§ 36-50.1.
Extension of general powers for actions taken pursuant to a conservation plan.

In implementing a conservation plan, an authority shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities provided in this chapter. However, the power of eminent domain shall not be exercised in connection with a conservation project except to acquire (i) properties designated for use by the public or a public agency in the conservation plan, (ii) properties which are determined by the authority to be in violation of the standards for design, construction, maintenance and use of property set out in the conservation plan for the project in which such property is situate, and which have not been made to comply with such standards within one year after a written request to rehabilitate to project standards is given to the owner by the authority, (iii) properties as to which voluntary conveyance cannot be effected in the course of the execution of the conservation plan because of the inability of the owners to convey marketable title, or (iv) properties which are infeasible of rehabilitation, blighted properties or properties which inhibit or prevent accomplishment of the purposes of the conservation plan.

History.

1964, c. 378; 1972, c. 733; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 rewrote the section heading, which formerly read: “Authority as to execution of ‘conservation plan’ generally”; substituted the first sentence for “In connection with the execution of a conservation plan, an authority shall have all of the powers and responsibilities vested in or imposed upon it in connection with redevelopment projects under this chapter, with the exception that,” in the second sentence, added “However,” redesignated former clauses (1) through (4) as clauses (i) through (iv), substituted “use by the public or a public agency” for “public use” in clause (i), and substituted “blighted properties or properties which inhibit or” for “or because of delapidation, obsolescence, faulty arrangement or design, steet or lot layout, deleterious land use or a combination thereof exert a blighting influence on adjacent properties or prevent proper development of land so as to inhibit or” in clause (iv).

§ 36-51.
Redevelopment plans.

An authority shall not implement any redevelopment plan under this law until the governing body of the locality has approved the redevelopment plan, which provides an outline for the development or redevelopment of the redevelopment area and is sufficiently complete to indicate (i) its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses and improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements; (ii) proposed land uses and building requirements in the redevelopment area; (iii) the land in the redevelopment area that the authority does not intend to acquire; (iv) the land in the redevelopment area that will be made available after acquisition to nongovernmental persons or entities for redevelopment and that land which will be made available after acquisition to public enterprise for redevelopment; (v) anticipated funding sources that may be sufficient to acquire all property designated for acquisition within five years of the locality’s approval; and (vi) the method for the temporary relocation of persons living in the redevelopment areas; and also the method for providing (unless already available) decent, safe and sanitary dwellings in the locality substantially equal in number to the number of substandard dwellings to be cleared from the redevelopment area, at rents within the financial reach of the income groups displaced from such substandard dwellings. Any locality is hereby authorized to approve redevelopment plans through their governing body or agency designated for that purpose.

No sooner than thirty months or later than thirty-six months following the date of the locality’s approval of the redevelopment plan (hereinafter called the “approval date”), the locality shall review and determine by resolution whether to reaffirm the redevelopment plan. Where the locality fails to reaffirm the redevelopment plan, any real property within the redevelopment area that has not been acquired by the authority, or for which a petition in condemnation has not been filed by the authority, prior to the date of adoption of such resolution by the locality (hereinafter called the “termination date”) shall no longer be eligible for acquisition by the authority unless the authority and the property owner mutually agree to the acquisition, in which case the authority shall be specifically empowered to acquire the property. For purposes of this section, a mediation request submitted by either the authority or the property owner, in accordance with §

36-27

, prior to the termination date shall preserve the authority’s right to file a petition in condemnation relating to such real property for a period of six months after the termination date.

Where the locality reaffirms the redevelopment plan, the authority shall continue to be authorized to acquire real property within the redevelopment area by purchase, or through the institution of eminent domain proceedings in accordance with §

36-27

, until the fifth anniversary of the approval date. Any real property within the redevelopment area that has not been acquired by the authority, or for which a petition in condemnation has not been filed by the authority, prior to the fifth anniversary of the approval date, shall no longer be eligible for acquisition by the authority unless the authority and the property owner mutually agree to the acquisition, in which case the authority shall be specifically empowered to acquire the property. For purposes of this section, a mediation request submitted by either the authority or the property owner, in accordance with §

36-27

, prior to the fifth anniversary of the approval date, shall preserve the authority’s right to file a petition in condemnation relating to the real property for a period of six months after the fifth anniversary of the approval date.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a locality shall not be precluded from adopting a new redevelopment plan, in accordance with this section, which designates a redevelopment area that includes real property that was previously included within a redevelopment area under a previously adopted redevelopment plan.

If the authority decides against acquiring real property designated for acquisition under an approved redevelopment plan after having made a written purchase offer to the owner of the property, it shall, upon the written request of the property owner given no later than one year after the date of written notice from the authority to the property owner of its decision not to acquire his property, reimburse the owner of the property his reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proposed acquisition of his property. Reasonable expenses shall include, but are not limited to, reasonable fees of attorneys and appraisers or other experts necessary to establish the value of the property to be appraised.

History.

1946, p. 279; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(8d); 2001, c. 729; 2006, c. 784.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 729 added the subsection A designator, and rewrote said subsection, and added subsections B through E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784 substituted “locality” or “locality’s” for “municipality” or “municipality’s” throughout the section; in subsection A, near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “implement any redevelopment plan” for “initiate redevelopment project” and “of the locality has approved the redevelopment plan” for “(or planning agency or other public agency designed by it or empowered by law so to act) of each city or town or county (hereinafter called a ‘municipality’) in which any of the area to be covered by such project (hereinafter called the ‘redevelopment area) is situated, has approved a plan (hereinafter called the ‘redevelopment plan’)” and substituted “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private enterprise” in clause (iv).

Law Review.

For article, “Property Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 777 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Housing, § 1; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 42.

§ 36-51.1.
Requirements for “conservation plan” generally.

An authority shall not implement any conservation plan under this law until the governing body of the locality has approved a conservation plan, which provides an outline for the conservation, development or redevelopment of the conservation area, affording maximum opportunity for conservation, rehabilitation or redevelopment by nongovernmental persons or entities consistent with the ends to be achieved, and is sufficiently complete to indicate (i) its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses and improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements; (ii) any conditions and limitations on acquisition of property; (iii) proposed land uses for the properties to be acquired; (iv) any conditions and limitations, including time limitation, under which property shall be made available for rehabilitation or redevelopment by public enterprise or nongovernmental persons or entities (by sale, lease or retention by the authority itself); (v) standards of design, construction, maintenance, and use of property and other measures to be taken or recommended toward elimination and prevention of blight and deterioration; (vi) the method for the temporary relocation of any persons living in the conservation area who will be displaced in accordance with the plan, as well as the method of providing (unless already available) decent, safe and sanitary dwellings in such city or county substantially equal in number to the number of substandard dwellings to be cleared from the conservation area, at rents within the financial reach of the income groups displaced from such substandard dwellings; (vii) any limitation on the length of time within which project activities can be undertaken; (viii) a procedure for administrative review of the determination at staff level and prior to a final determination by the authority under §

36-50.1

that an individual property is in violation of project standards and, therefore, subject to condemnation; and (ix) the procedure by which such conservation plan may be amended.

History.

1964, c. 378; 1966, c. 81; 2006, c. 784.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784, in the introductory language, substituted “implement any conservation plan” for “initiate any conservation project” and “of the locality has approved a conservation plan” for “(or planning agency or other public agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act) of each city or county having the power granted by §

36-49.1

in which any of the area to be covered by such project is situated, has approved a ‘conservation plan,’ ” inserted “conservation” and substituted “nongovernmental persons or entities” for “private enterprise,” redesignated clause (1) through (9) as clause (i) through (ix), substituted “public enterprise or nongovernmental persons or entities” for “public or private enterprise” in clause (iv), inserted “and deterioration” in clause (v), and in clause (vi), substituted “the conservation area” for “such area” and inserted “conservation.”